Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 16 COURSES OF INSTRUCTION
33-1625. Youth athletes — Concussion and head injury guidelines and requirements.

The state board of education and the Idaho high school activities association shall provide access to appropriate guidelines and information that identify the signs and symptoms of a concussion and head injury and describe the nature and risk of concussion and head injury in accordance with standards of the centers for disease control and prevention through a link on the internet website of the board and the Idaho high school activities association.

This section shall apply to any middle school, junior high school and high school in the state participating in or administering an organized athletic league or sport. For the purposes of this section, “youth athlete” or “athlete” means an individual who is eighteen (18) years of age or younger and who is a participant in any middle school, junior high school or high school athletic league or sport.

At the beginning of each sports season before a youth athlete participates in any organized practice or game, the youth athlete and the youth athlete’s parent or guardian shall receive the guidelines and information described in subsection (1) of this section from the school for which the athlete plays, and shall review the guidelines and information. Coaches, referees, game officials, game judges and athletic trainers shall review such guidelines and information upon employment and biennially thereafter.

Schools shall obtain written consent from the youth athlete’s parent or guardian on an annual basis attesting to the fact that the youth athlete’s parent or guardian has received a copy of the concussion information and guidelines as outlined in subsection (3) of this section, acknowledges the inherent risk and authorizes the youth athlete to participate in athletic activity.

If during a practice or game or competition, it is reasonably suspected that a youth athlete has sustained a concussion or head injury and exhibits outward signs or symptoms of such, as defined by the centers for disease control and prevention, then the youth athlete shall be removed from play. Every Idaho middle school, junior high school and high school that participates in or offers an organized athletic league shall develop protocol to be followed for removing such athletes from play. Such protocol shall be consistent with concussion and head injury guidelines of the centers for disease control and prevention.

An athlete may be returned to play once the athlete is evaluated and authorized to return by a qualified health care professional who is trained in the evaluation and management of concussions. For the purposes of this section, “qualified health care professional” means and includes any one (1) of the following who is trained in the evaluation and management of concussions:

A physician or physician assistant licensed under chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code;

An advanced practice nurse licensed under section 54-1409, Idaho Code; or

A licensed health care professional trained in the evaluation and management of concussions who is supervised by a directing physician who is licensed under chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code.

Students who have sustained a concussion and return to school may need informal or formal accommodations, modifications of curriculum, and monitoring by medical or academic staff until the student is fully recovered. A student athlete should be able to resume all normally scheduled academic activities without restrictions or the need for accommodation prior to receiving authorization to return to play by a qualified health care professional as defined in subsection (6) of this section.
(8) If an individual reasonably acts in accordance with the protocol developed pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, then acting upon such protocol shall not form the basis of a claim for negligence in a civil action.

(9) Any youth sport organization or association in this state may comply with this section. If a youth sport organization or association is in full compliance with this section, then the youth sport organization or association shall be afforded the same protections from liability in a civil action pursuant to subsection (8) of this section.

33-1626. Advanced opportunities. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 58, § 2, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 33-4602.

33-1627. Math initiative.

The legislature finds that mathematical skills are increasingly important to the future academic and career success of students. The legislature further finds that student mathematical skills are not currently meeting the needs of Idaho’s economy and must be improved. To this end, the state department of education shall promote the improvement of mathematical instruction and student achievement through one (1) or more of the following activities:

Provide high quality professional development for teachers that is intensive, ongoing and connected to classroom practice, that focuses on student learning, aligns with school improvement priorities and goals, and builds strong working relationships among teachers;

Provide statewide online mathematical instruction programs that furnish mathematical tutoring, remedial instruction and advanced instruction;

Provide formative assessments to assist teachers in identifying student mathematical skill levels, areas of deficiency and areas of advancement.

The cost of math initiative activities provided for in this section shall be paid by the state department of education from moneys appropriated for this program in the educational support program budget.

33-1628. Firearms safety education in primary and secondary schools.

The board of trustees of a school district is encouraged to establish and maintain a firearms safety education course for primary and secondary school students. The trustees may adopt an elective course of instruction developed by the department of fish and game, a law enforcement agency, or a national firearms association as its firearms safety education course. Instructors from the department of fish and game, a law enforcement agency or a national firearms association, or a person recognized by the trustees as having expertise in firearms safety education may provide the course instruction.

33-1629. Agricultural and natural resource education programs.

Idaho Quality Program Standards Incentive Grants.

The board for career technical education shall adopt and implement Idaho quality program standards for agricultural and natural resource education programs offered in any grade 9 through 12. Such standards shall apply to the areas of instruction, curriculum development, advisory committees, student development and community development. Such standards shall be used to assess the quality of local programs and to set goals for continued program improvement.

The board for career technical education shall establish and administer an incentive grant program for instructors of agricultural and natural resource education programs offered in any grade 9 through 12 where such programs meet or exceed the applicable Idaho quality program standards as determined by the board. A district may apply to the board, on behalf of an instructor, for a grant provided for in this subsection. The board shall develop an application form and criteria to judge each application for the grant program. Grant awards shall be made by the board to instructors of programs that meet or exceed the criteria established by the board. The maximum amount of an incentive grant as provided for in this section shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

There is hereby created in the state treasury the quality program standards incentive grant fund, to which shall be credited all moneys both public and private that may be appropriated, allocated, donated, distributed to or otherwise provided for by law. Moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively for incentive grants as provided for in this subsection. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated for the purposes of this incentive grant program. All idle moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in a like manner as provided for in section 67-1210, Idaho Code, with respect to other surplus or idle moneys in the state treasury. Interest earned on the investments shall be returned to the fund.

The board for career technical education shall in its annual budget request to the legislature request funding for the grant program provided for in this section.

The board for career technical education shall adopt rules to implement the grant program established by this subsection.

Agricultural Education Program Start-Up Grants.

The board for career technical education shall establish and administer a start-up grant program for school districts and public charter schools to begin or to re-establish an agricultural and natural resource education program in any grade 9 through 12.

The board shall develop an application form and criteria to judge each application for a start-up grant. Any school district or public charter school may apply for a start-up grant.

There shall be no more than four (4) start-up grants awarded per school year. The maximum award for any one (1) start-up grant shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

There is hereby created in the state treasury the agricultural and natural resource education program start-up grant fund, to which shall be credited all moneys both public and private that may be appropriated, allocated, donated, distributed to or otherwise provided for by law. Moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively for start-up grants as provided for in this subsection. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated for the purposes of this start-up grant program. All idle moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in a like manner as provided for in section 67-1210, Idaho Code, with respect to other surplus or idle moneys in the state treasury. Interest earned on the investments shall be returned to the fund.

The board for career technical education shall in its annual budget request to the legislature request funding for the grant program provided for in this subsection.

The board for career technical education shall adopt rules to implement the grant program established by this subsection.

The provisions of this section shall apply to agricultural and natural resource education programs provided for in grades 9 through 12.

33-1630. Elementary and secondary education act flexibility document — State board of and state department of education duties.

The state board of education shall promulgate rules setting forth the provisions of the flexibility document associated with the federal elementary and secondary education act (ESEA). The purpose of the document is to achieve flexibility for state and local education agencies (LEA). Such document shall include testing for grades 3 through 8 and once in high school at the minimum. Such document shall include the following:

A testing schedule for pupils in grade 11 who shall take a college or career ready assessment;

A provision stating that LEAs may conduct additional formative or pre- and post-testing as needed;

A provision stating that federal testing requirements may be used as graduation criteria;

A provision stating that the state education agency will select an appropriate statewide test based on, at a minimum, such elements as adherence to Idaho’s content standards for learning, cost and duration or type, i.e., written or computer adaptive; and

A provision for maintenance of a statewide learning management system of reporting for the support of LEAs that maximizes communication, collaboration and mastery of academic content. Reporting in this section is intended to satisfy the minimum federal requirements of the consolidated state performance report (CSPR) and serve as a tool for LEAs to measure individual growth or achievement and system accountability.

The state department of education shall begin to review the Idaho’s standards for learning of math and English language arts (ELA) in 2015. Idaho’s content standards of learning are intended to reinforce our commitment to maintaining a college and career ready standard.

33-1631. Requirements for harassment, intimidation and bullying information and professional development.

School districts and charter schools shall undertake reasonable efforts to ensure that information on harassment, intimidation and bullying of students is disseminated annually to all school personnel, parents and students, including an affirmation that school personnel are authorized and expected to intervene or facilitate intervention on behalf of students facing harassment, intimidation or bullying.

School districts and charter schools shall provide ongoing professional development to build skills of all school staff members to prevent, identify and respond to harassment, intimidation and bullying. The state board shall promulgate rules regarding the content of the professional development required by this subsection.

District policies shall include a series of graduated consequences that may include, but are not limited to, referral to counseling, diversion, use of juvenile specialty courts, restorative practices, on-site suspension and expulsion for any student who commits an act of bullying, intimidation, harassment, violence or threats of violence. Guidelines for such policies will be set forth in the rules of the state board.

Annually school districts shall report bullying incidents to the state department of education in a format set forth in rule by the state board. District policy shall designate persons to whom bullying reports are to be made and a procedure for a teacher or other school employee, student, parent, guardian or other person to report or otherwise provide information on bullying activity.

33-1632. Mastery-based education.

The legislature finds that moving toward mastery-based education where students progress as they demonstrate mastery of a subject or grade level is in the best interest of Idaho students. The legislature further finds that moving from the current time-based system to a mastery-based approach will allow for more personalized and differentiated learning; create a focus on explicit, measurable, transferable learning objectives that empower students; and emphasize competencies that include application and knowledge along with skill development.

The state department of education shall perform the following activities to move Idaho toward mastery-based education:

Provide ongoing statewide outreach and communications to increase awareness and understanding of and promote interest in mastery-based education for teachers, administrators, parents, students, business leaders, and policymakers;

Facilitate and maintain the Idaho mastery education network composed of Idaho public school districts and charter schools that collaborate to transition Idaho to mastery-based education. The network shall:

Advise the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education on the progress of the transition to mastery-based education;

Develop evidence-based recommendations for continued implementation;

Implement the policies of the legislature and the state board of education for the transition to mastery-based education; and

Provide network resources, including professional development, coaching, and best practices, to Idaho public school districts and charter schools; and

Create a sustainability plan for statewide scaling of mastery-based education and ensure that all public school districts and charter schools participating in the Idaho mastery education network develop plans that describe how the public school district or charter school will maintain a mastery-based approach to education. Plans must include a process to develop the rubrics and assessments necessary to determine mastery and award credit.

The state department of education may expend or distribute moneys appropriated for purposes identified in subsection (2) of this section directly to public school districts and charter schools that are participating in the mastery education network and have applied and been selected to receive mastery-based education grants. The cost of activities provided for in this section shall be paid by the state department of education from moneys appropriated for this program in the educational support program budget as provided for in section 33-1002, Idaho Code.

Any public school district or charter school may participate in the mastery education network by applying to the state department of education, even if such district or school is not selected to receive mastery-based education grants.

No later than January 31 of each year, the state department of education shall report annually to the state board of education and the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives regarding the progress toward implementing mastery-based education.

For purposes of this section:

“Mastery-based education” means an education system where student progress is based on a student’s demonstration of mastery of competencies and content, not seat time or the age or grade level of the student.

“Network” means the Idaho mastery education network.

33-1633. Computer science initiative for public schools.

As used in this section:

“Blended professional development” means to deliver content and training to teachers and administrators in a combination of online and face-to-face.

“Computer science” means the study of principles, applications and technologies of computing and computers.

The STEM action center, the state board of education and the state department of education shall collaborate to develop and implement a computer science initiative for public schools by:

Adopting computer science content standards in 2016 aligned with nationally recognized computer science education standards with input from Idaho educators and industries for implementation in the 2017-2018 school year;

Providing for professional development in teaching computer science by:

Developing resources for teachers and administrators relating to teaching computational thinking;

Providing statewide, regional, online and blended professional development opportunities for school district staff;

Partnering with entities such as the Idaho digital learning academy, public higher education institutions and industry to develop, deliver and provide professional development in computer science for teachers; and

Distributing grants to school districts and charter schools that may be used to provide incentives for teachers to pursue training in computer science or earn a computer science endorsement;

Maintaining, using and enhancing access to an online portal or repository of instructional resources that:

Is available for public school districts and public charter schools to use as a resource;

Includes high-quality computer science instructional resources that are designed to teach K-12 students computational thinking skills and are in alignment with the state computer science content standards;

Leverages existing online resources and portals developed by state and governmental entities; and

Allows for collaborative contribution and sharing of resources by teachers, administrators, parents and students;

Ensuring that the state department of education and the Idaho digital learning academy evaluate providers of comprehensive computer science instructional solutions and provide research, support and guidance on implementing solutions for computer science courses or programs aligned with the state computer science content standards;

Creating opportunities for schools to partner with local companies to provide for student and teacher mentoring and internships in the computer science field;

Communicating and supporting computer science initiatives, programs, events, training and other promotions throughout the state for the benefit of school districts, students, parents and local communities; and

Creating equitable access to computer science resources and programs aligned with the state computer science content standards for teachers, administrators and students throughout the state.

The STEM action center, the state board of education and the state department of education shall, when economical and beneficial, leverage existing state resources and systems to effectively and efficiently carry out the directives of this computer science initiative for public schools.

The STEM action center board may select one (1) or more providers through a request for proposals process to provide a comprehensive computer science solution for public school districts and public charter schools to implement.

The STEM action center, the division of career technical education and industry shall collaborate to create technical secondary and postsecondary courses of study in areas related to computer science that meet workforce needs.

The STEM action center shall collaborate with the state board of education, division of career technical education, the state department of education, public higher education institutions and industry to develop a communication plan related to the computer science initiative.

The STEM action center and the state board of education shall provide an annual report to the legislature on the status of this initiative.

33-1634. Computer science.

Starting in fiscal year 2020, each school district, specially chartered district and public charter school serving students in grades 9 through 12 inclusive, or any combination thereof, shall make available to all students in grades 9 through 12 one (1) or more courses in computer science. Students must have the option of taking the course as part of their course schedule during normal instructional hours at the school in which the student is enrolled. Such courses may be offered through virtual education programs and online courses, traditional in-person courses or hybrid courses consisting of a combination of online and in-person instruction. Computer science courses must be aligned with the Idaho content standards for computer science.

33-1635. Career technical education program quality and workforce readiness incentive program.

It is the ultimate goal of the legislature that every student have access to career technical education courses and programs that lead to workforce readiness certification.

The state board for career technical education shall establish and administer a quality program funding mechanism for high-quality career technical education secondary programs and program technical assistance offered in grades 9 through 12.

Quality program incentive funding will be available to high-performing approved career technical education programs in the areas of business management and marketing, engineering and technology, family and consumer sciences, health sciences, and skilled and technical sciences.

Technical assistance funding will be available to approved career technical education programs in the areas of agriculture and natural resources, business management and marketing, engineering and technology, family and consumer sciences, health sciences, and skilled and technical sciences.

The division of career technical education will develop criteria to evaluate each program and will award funding to those programs that meet or exceed the criteria established by the division for quality program funding and technical assistance funding. Specific criteria will be developed for each type of program. Types of programs will be defined by the state board for career technical education. All eligible career technical programs will be considered for funding. Eligible programs may not be career technical schools and must meet all eligibility criteria developed by the division of career technical education. The amount of each award will be determined each award cycle by the division of career technical education and will be contingent upon the availability of appropriated funds.

Workforce readiness incentive funding.

Eligible career technical education pathway programs in any career technical education program area may receive workforce readiness incentive funds. Workforce readiness incentive funds will be distributed based on the number of secondary career technical concentrators who have demonstrated workforce readiness at the completion of the career technical education program.

The division of career technical education will develop criteria to evaluate each program and will award funding to those programs that meet or exceed the criteria established by the division for quality program funding and technical assistance funding. Specific criteria will be developed for each type of program. Types of programs will be defined by the state board for career technical education. All eligible career technical programs will be considered for funding. Eligible programs may not be career technical schools and must meet all eligibility criteria developed by the division of career technical education. The amount of each award will be determined each award cycle by the division of career technical education and will be contingent upon the availability of appropriated funds.

The state board for career technical education may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.